Colorado statutes. TITLE 14 Domestic Matters
ARTICLE 10 UNIFORM DISSOLUTION OF MARRIAGE ACT
14-10-115. Child support guidelines - purpose - determination of income - schedule of basic child support obligations - adjustments to basic child support - additional guidelines - child support commission - definitions.

Purpose and applicability.

The child support guidelines and schedule of basic child support obligations have the following purposes:

To establish as state policy an adequate standard of support for children, subject to the ability of parents to pay;

To make awards more equitable by ensuring more consistent treatment of persons in similar circumstances; and

To improve the efficiency of the court process by promoting settlements and giving courts and the parties guidance in establishing levels of awards.

The child support guidelines and schedule of basic child support obligations do the following:

Calculate child support based upon the parents' combined adjusted gross income estimated to have been allocated to the child if the parents and children were living in an intact household;

Adjust the child support based upon the needs of the children for extraordinary medical expenses and work-related child care costs; and

Allocate the amount of child support to be paid by each parent based upon physical care arrangements.

This section shall apply to all child support obligations, established or modified, as a part of any proceeding, including, but not limited to, articles 5, 6, and 10 of this title and articles 4 and 6 of title 19, C.R.S., regardless of when filed.

Duty of support - factors to consider.

In a proceeding for dissolution of marriage, legal separation, maintenance, or child support, the court may order either or both parents owing a duty of support to a child of the marriage to pay an amount reasonable or necessary for the child's support and may order an amount determined to be reasonable under the circumstances for a time period that occurred after the date of the parties' physical separation or the filing of the petition or service upon the respondent, whichever date is latest, and prior to the entry of the support order, without regard to marital misconduct.

In determining the amount of support under this subsection (2), the court shall consider all relevant factors, including:

The financial resources of the child;

The financial resources of the custodial parent;

The standard of living the child would have enjoyed had the marriage not been dissolved;

The physical and emotional condition of the child and his or her educational needs; and

The financial resources and needs of the noncustodial parent.

Definitions. As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Adjusted gross income" means gross income, as specified in subsection (5) of this section, less preexisting child support obligations and less alimony or maintenance actually paid by a parent, as described in subsection (3)(a)(II) of this section.

For purposes of this subsection (3)(a), if the alimony or maintenance actually paid by a parent is deductible for federal income tax purposes by that parent, then the actual amount of alimony or maintenance paid by that parent must be deducted from that parent's gross income. If the alimony or maintenance actually paid by a parent is not deductible for federal income tax purposes by that parent, then the amount of alimony or maintenance deducted from that parent's gross income is the amount of alimony or maintenance actually paid by that parent multiplied by 1.25.

"Combined gross income" means the combined monthly adjusted gross incomes of both parents.

"Income" means the actual gross income of a parent, if employed to full capacity, or potential income, if unemployed or underemployed. Gross income of each parent shall be determined according to subsection (5) of this section.

"Mandatory school fees" means fees charged by a school or school district, including a charter school, for a child attending public primary or secondary school for activities that are directly related to the educational mission of the school, including but not limited to laboratory fees; book or educational material fees; school computer or automation-related fees, whether paid to the school directly or purchased by a parent; testing fees; and supply or material fees paid to the school. "Mandatory school fees" does not include uniforms, meals, or extracurricular activity fees.

"Number of children due support", as used in the schedule of basic child support obligations specified in subsection (7) of this section, means children for whom the parents share joint legal responsibility and for whom support is being sought.

"Other children" means children who are not the subject of the child support determination at issue.

"Postsecondary education" includes college and career and technical education programs.

"Postsecondary education support" means support for the following expenses associated with attending a college, university, or career and technical education program: Tuition, books, and fees.

"Shared physical care", for the purposes of the child support guidelines and schedule of basic child support obligations specified in this section, and as further specified in paragraph (b) of subsection (8) of this section, means that each parent keeps the children overnight for more than ninety-two overnights each year and that both parents contribute to the expenses of the children in addition to the payment of child support.

"Split physical care", for the purposes of the child support guidelines and schedule of basic child support obligations specified in this section, and as further specified in paragraph (c) of subsection (8) of this section, means that each parent has physical care of at least one of the children by means of that child or children residing with that parent the majority of the time.

Forms - identifying information.

The child support guidelines shall be used with standardized child support guideline forms to be issued by the judicial department. The judicial department is responsible for promulgating and updating the Colorado child support guideline forms, schedules, worksheets, and instructions.

All child support orders entered pursuant to this article shall provide the names and dates of birth of the parties and of the children who are the subject of the order and the parties' residential and mailing addresses. The social security numbers of the parties and children shall be collected pursuant to section 14-14-113 and section 26-13-127, C.R.S.

Determination of income.

For the purposes of the child support guidelines and schedule of basic child support obligations specified in this section, the gross income of each parent shall be determined according to the following guidelines:

"Gross income" includes income from any source, except as otherwise provided in subsection (5)(a)(II) of this section, and includes, but is not limited to:

Income from salaries;

Wages, including tips declared by the individual for purposes of reporting to the federal internal revenue service or tips imputed to bring the employee's gross earnings to the minimum wage for the number of hours worked, whichever is greater;

Commissions;

Payments received as an independent contractor for labor or services, which payments must be considered income from self-employment;

Bonuses;

Dividends;

Severance pay;

Pensions and retirement benefits, including but not limited to those paid pursuant to articles 51, 54, 54.5, and 54.6 of title 24, C.R.S., and article 30 of title 31, C.R.S.;

Royalties;

Rents;

Interest;

Trust income;

Annuities;

Capital gains;

Any moneys drawn by a self-employed individual for personal use that are deducted as a business expense, which moneys must be considered income from self-employment;

Social security benefits, including social security benefits actually received by a parent as a result of the disability of that parent or as the result of the death of the minor child's stepparent but not including social security benefits received by a minor child or on behalf of a minor child as a result of the death or disability of a stepparent of the child;

Workers' compensation benefits;

Unemployment insurance benefits;

Disability insurance benefits;

Funds held in or payable from any health, accident, disability, or casualty insurance to the extent that such insurance replaces wages or provides income in lieu of wages;

Monetary gifts;

Monetary prizes, excluding lottery winnings not required by the rules of the Colorado lottery commission to be paid only at the lottery office;

Income from general partnerships, limited partnerships, closely held corporations, or limited liability companies. However, if a parent is a passive investor, has a minority interest in the company, and does not have any managerial duties or input, then the income to be recognized may be limited to actual cash distributions received.

Expense reimbursements or in-kind payments received by a parent in the course of employment, self-employment, or operation of a business if they are significant and reduce personal living expenses;

Alimony or maintenance received, as adjusted, if applicable, pursuant to subsection (5)(a)(I.5) of this section; and

Overtime pay, only if the overtime is required by the employer as a condition of employment.

(I.5) For purposes of subsection (5)(a)(I)(Y) of this section, if the alimony or maintenance actually received by a parent is taxable income to that parent for federal income tax purposes, then the actual amount of alimony or maintenance received is included in that parent's gross income. If the alimony or maintenance actually received by a parent is not taxable income to that parent for federal income tax purposes, then the amount of alimony or maintenance that is included in that parent's gross income is the amount of alimony or maintenance received by that parent multiplied by 1.25.

"Gross income" does not include:

Child support payments received;

Benefits received from means-tested public assistance programs, including but not limited to assistance provided under the Colorado works program, as described in part 7 of article 2 of title 26, C.R.S., supplemental security income, food stamps, and general assistance;

Income from additional jobs that result in the employment of the obligor more than forty hours per week or more than what would otherwise be considered to be full-time employment;

Social security benefits received by the minor children, or on behalf of the minor children, as a result of the death or disability of a stepparent are not to be included as income for the minor children for the determination of child support; and

Earnings or gains on a retirement account, including an IRA, which earnings or gains must not be included as income unless or until a parent takes a distribution from the account. If a distribution from a retirement account may be taken without being subject to an IRS penalty for early distribution and the parent decides not to take the distribution, the court may consider the distribution that could have been taken in determining the parent's gross income if the parent is not otherwise employed full-time and the retirement account was not received pursuant to the division of marital property.

For income from self-employment, rent, royalties, proprietorship of a business, or joint ownership of a partnership or closely held corporation, "gross income" equals gross receipts minus ordinary and necessary expenses, as defined in sub-subparagraph (B) of this subparagraph (III), required to produce such income.

"Ordinary and necessary expenses" does not include amounts allowable by the internal revenue service for the accelerated component of depreciation expenses or investment tax credits or any other business expenses determined by the court to be inappropriate for determining gross income for purposes of calculating child support.

An incarcerated parent sentenced to one hundred eighty days or more.

(I.5) If the court or delegate child support enforcement unit imputes income pursuant to this subsection (5), the provisions of subsection (5)(b.5) of this section apply.

If a parent is voluntarily unemployed or underemployed, child support must be calculated based on a determination of potential income; except that a determination of potential income must not be made for:

If a noncustodial parent who owes past-due child support is unemployed and not incapacitated and has an obligation of support to a child receiving assistance pursuant to part 7 of article 2 of title 26, C.R.S., the court or delegate child support enforcement unit may order the parent to pay such support in accordance with a plan approved by the court or to participate in work activities. Work activities may include one or more of the following:

Private or public sector employment;

Job search activities;

Community service;

Vocational training; or

Any other employment-related activities available to that particular individual.

For the purposes of this section, a parent is not deemed "underemployed" if:

The employment is temporary and is reasonably intended to result in higher income within the foreseeable future; or

The employment is a good faith career choice that is not intended to deprive a child of support and does not unreasonably reduce the support available to a child; or

The parent is enrolled full-time in an educational or vocational program or is employed part-time while enrolled in a part-time educational or vocational program, based on the institution's enrollment definitions, and the program is reasonably intended to result in a degree or certification within a reasonable period of time; completing the program will result in a higher income; the program is a good faith career choice that is not intended to deprive the child of support; and the parent's participation in the program does not unreasonably reduce the amount of child support available to a child.

(A) A parent who is physically or mentally incapacitated;

(B) A parent who is caring for a child under the age of twenty-four months for whom the parents owe a joint legal responsibility; or

Except as otherwise provided in this section, if the court or delegate child support enforcement unit determines that a parent is voluntarily unemployed or underemployed or employment information is unreliable, the court or delegate child support enforcement unit shall determine and document, for the record, the parent's potential income.

In determining potential income, the court or delegate child support enforcement unit shall consider, to the extent known, the specific circumstances of the parent, including consideration of the following information, when available:

The parent's assets;

Residence;

Employment and earnings history;

Job skills;

Educational attainment;

Literacy;

Age;

Health;

Criminal record;

Other employment barriers;

Record of seeking work;

The local job market;

The availability of employers hiring in the community, without changing existing law regarding the burden of proof;

Prevailing earnings level in the local community; and

Other relevant background factors in the case.

Income statements of the parents shall be verified with documentation of both current and past earnings. Suitable documentation of current earnings includes pay stubs, employer statements, or receipts and expenses if self-employed. Documentation of current earnings shall be supplemented with copies of the most recent tax return to provide verification of earnings over a longer period. A copy of wage statements or other wage information obtained from the computer database maintained by the department of labor and employment shall be admissible into evidence for purposes of determining income under this subsection (5).

Adjustments to gross income.

At the time a child support order is initially established, or in any proceeding to modify a child support order, if a parent is also legally responsible for the support of any other children for whom the parents do not share joint legal responsibility, the court shall make an adjustment to the parent's gross income prior to calculating the basic child support obligation for the child or children who are the subject of the support order in question as follows:

If a parent is obligated to pay support for another child pursuant to an order, the amount actually paid on the order must be deducted from that parent's gross income;

If the other child is residing in the home of a parent, the court shall deduct from that parent's gross income the amount calculated pursuant to paragraph (b) of this subsection (6);

If another child of a parent is residing outside the home of that parent, the court shall deduct from that parent's gross income the amount of documented money payments actually paid by the parent for the support of the other child, not to exceed the schedule of basic support obligations set forth in subsection (7) of this section.

The amount of the adjustment must not exceed the schedule of basic support obligations listed in this section. For a parent with gross income of less than one thousand five hundred dollars, the adjustment is seventy-five percent of the amount listed under the schedule of basic child support obligations in subsection (7)(b) of this section that would represent a child support obligation based only upon the responsible parent's income, without any other adjustments for the number of children for whom the parent is responsible. For a parent with gross income of one thousand five hundred dollars or more per month, the adjustment is seventy-five percent of the amount listed under the schedule of basic child support obligations in subsection (7)(b) of this section that would represent a child support obligation based only upon the responsible parent's income, without any other adjustments for the number of other children for whom the parent is responsible. The amount calculated as set forth in this subsection (6)(b) must be subtracted from the amount of the parent's gross income prior to calculating the basic child support obligation based upon both parents' gross income, as provided in subsection (7) of this section.

Schedule of basic child support obligations.

The basic child support obligation shall be determined using the schedule of basic child support obligations contained in paragraph (b) of this subsection (7). The basic child support obligation shall be divided between the parents in proportion to their adjusted gross incomes.

For combined gross income that falls between amounts shown in the schedule of basic child support obligations, basic child support amounts shall be interpolated. The category entitled "number of children due support" in the schedule of basic child support obligations shall have the meaning defined in subsection (3) of this section.

In circumstances in which the obligor's monthly adjusted gross income is less than one thousand five hundred dollars but more than six hundred fifty dollars, the obligor is required to pay a child support payment of fifty dollars per month for one child, seventy dollars per month for two children, ninety dollars per month for three children, one hundred ten dollars per month for four children, one hundred thirty dollars per month for five children, and one hundred fifty dollars per month for six or more children. The minimum order amount shall not apply when each parent keeps the children more than ninety-two overnights each year as defined in subsection (3)(h) of this section. In no case, however, shall the amount of child support ordered to be paid exceed the amount of child support that would otherwise be ordered to be paid if the parents did not share physical custody.

For an obligor with an adjusted gross income that is less than or equal to one thousand five hundred dollars but more than six hundred fifty dollars, the obligor's child support amount, as determined pursuant to subsection (7)(a)(II)(B) of this section, must be adjusted pursuant to subsection (11)(c)(III) of this section. The obligor's child support amount may be further adjusted to include a share of the work-related and education-related child care costs, health insurance, extraordinary medical expenses, and other extraordinary adjustments as described in subsections (9), (10), (11)(a), and (11)(b) of this section. However, if at the time the child support obligation is calculated, adjustments made pursuant to subsections (9), (10), (11)(a), and (11)(b) of this section, together with the low-income adjustment amount, exceed twenty percent of the obligor's adjusted gross income, the child support obligation must be capped at twenty percent of the obligor's adjusted gross income. The low-income adjustment does not apply when each parent keeps the children more than ninety-two overnights each year as defined in subsection (8) of this section. In no case, however, shall the amount of child support ordered to be paid exceed the amount of child support that would otherwise be ordered to be paid if the parents did not share physical custody.

In any circumstance in which the obligor's monthly adjusted gross income is less than or equal to six hundred fifty dollars, regardless of the monthly adjusted gross income of the obligee, the obligor must be ordered to pay the minimum monthly order amount in child support. The minimum order amount is ten dollars per month, regardless of the number of children between these parties. The ten-dollar minimum monthly order amount is not adjusted by the number of the obligor's overnights with children.

The judge may use discretion to determine child support in circumstances where combined adjusted gross income exceeds the uppermost levels of the schedule of basic child support obligations; except that the presumptive basic child support obligation shall not be less than it would be based on the highest level of adjusted gross income set forth in the schedule of basic child support obligations.

Schedule of basic child support obligations:

Computation of basic child support - shared physical care - split physical care - stipulations - deviations - basis for periodic updates.

Except in cases of shared physical care or split physical care as defined in paragraphs (h) and (i) of subsection (3) of this section, a total child support obligation is determined by adding each parent's respective basic child support obligation, as determined through the guidelines and schedule of basic child support obligations specified in subsection (7) of this section, work-related net child care costs, extraordinary medical expenses, and extraordinary adjustments to the schedule of basic child support obligations. The parent receiving a child support payment shall be presumed to spend his or her total child support obligation directly on the children. The parent paying child support to the other parent shall owe his or her total child support obligation as child support to the other parent minus any ordered payments included in the calculations made directly on behalf of the children for work-related net child care costs, extraordinary medical expenses, or extraordinary adjustments to the schedule of basic child support obligations.

Because shared physical care presumes that certain basic expenses for the children will be duplicated, an adjustment for shared physical care is made by multiplying the basic child support obligation by one and fifty hundredths (1.50). In cases of shared physical care, each parent's adjusted basic child support obligation obtained by application of paragraph (b) of subsection (7) of this section shall first be divided between the parents in proportion to their respective adjusted gross incomes. Each parent's share of the adjusted basic child support obligation shall then be multiplied by the percentage of time the children spend with the other parent to determine the theoretical basic child support obligation owed to the other parent. To these amounts shall be added each parent's proportionate share of work-related net child care costs, extraordinary medical expenses, and extraordinary adjustments to the schedule of basic child support obligations. The parent owing the greater amount of child support shall owe the difference between the two amounts as a child support order minus any ordered direct payments made on behalf of the children for work-related net child care costs, extraordinary medical expenses, or extraordinary adjustments to the schedule of basic child support obligations. In no case, however, shall the amount of child support ordered to be paid exceed the amount of child support that would otherwise be ordered to be paid if the parents did not share physical custody.

In cases of split physical care, a child support obligation shall be computed separately for each parent based upon the number of children living with the other parent in accordance with subsections (7), (9), (10), and (11) of this section. The amount so determined shall be a theoretical support obligation due each parent for support of the child or children for whom he or she has primary physical custody. The obligations so determined shall then be offset, with the parent owing the larger amount owing the difference between the two amounts as a child support order.

If the parents also share physical care as outlined in paragraph (b) of this subsection (8), an additional adjustment for shared physical care shall be made as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection (8).

Stipulations presented to the court shall be reviewed by the court for approval. No hearing shall be required; however, the court shall use the guidelines and schedule of basic child support obligations to review the adequacy of child support orders negotiated by the parties as well as the financial affidavit that fully discloses the financial status of the parties as required for use of the guidelines and schedule of basic child support obligations.

In an action to establish or modify child support, whether temporary or permanent, the guidelines and schedule of basic child support obligations set forth in subsection (7) of this section shall be used as a rebuttable presumption for the establishment or modification of the amount of child support. A court may deviate from the guidelines and schedule of basic child support obligations where its application would be inequitable, unjust, or inappropriate. Any such deviation shall be accompanied by written or oral findings by the court specifying the reasons for the deviation and the presumed amount under the guidelines and schedule of basic child support obligations without a deviation. These reasons may include, but are not limited to, instances where one of the parents spends substantially more time with the child than is reflected by a straight calculation of overnights, the extraordinary medical expenses incurred for treatment of either parent or a current spouse, extraordinary costs associated with parenting time, the gross disparity in income between the parents, the ownership by a parent of a substantial nonincome producing asset, consistent overtime not considered in gross income under sub-subparagraph (C) of subparagraph (II) of paragraph (a) of subsection (5) of this section, or income from employment that is in addition to a full-time job or that results in the employment of the obligor more than forty hours per week or more than what would otherwise be considered to be full-time employment. The existence of a factor enumerated in this section does not require the court to deviate from the guidelines and basic schedule of child support obligations but may be a factor to be considered in the decision to deviate. The court may deviate from the guidelines and basic schedule of child support obligations even if a factor enumerated in this section does not exist.

The guidelines and schedule of basic child support obligations may be used by the parties as the basis for periodic updates of child support obligations.

For purposes of calculating child support, when two or more children are included in the child support worksheet calculation and the parties have a different number of overnights with two or more of the children, the number of overnights used to determine child support is determined by adding together the number of overnights for each child and then dividing that number by the number of children included in the child support worksheet calculation.

Adjustments for child care costs.

Net child care costs incurred on behalf of the children due to employment or job search or the education of either parent shall be added to the basic obligation and shall be divided between the parents in proportion to their adjusted gross incomes.

Child care costs shall not exceed the level required to provide quality care from a licensed source for the children. The value of the federal income tax credit for child care shall be subtracted from actual costs to arrive at a figure for net child care costs.

Adjustments for health-care expenditures for children.

In orders issued pursuant to this section, the court shall also provide for the child's or children's current and future medical needs by ordering either parent or both parents to initiate medical or medical and dental insurance coverage for the child or children through currently effective medical or medical and dental insurance policies held by the parent or parents, purchase medical or medical and dental insurance for the child or children, or provide the child or children with current and future medical needs through some other manner. If a parent has been directed to provide insurance pursuant to this section and that parent's spouse provides the insurance for the benefit of the child or children either directly or through employment, a credit on the child support worksheet shall be given to the parent in the same manner as if the premium were paid by the parent. At the same time, the court shall order payment of medical insurance or medical and dental insurance deductibles and copayments.

The payment of a premium to provide health insurance coverage on behalf of the children subject to the order shall be added to the basic child support obligation and shall be divided between the parents in proportion to their adjusted gross income.

The amount to be added to the basic child support obligation shall be the actual amount of the total insurance premium that is attributable to the child who is the subject of the order. If this amount is not available or cannot be verified, the total cost of the premium should be divided by the total number of persons covered by the policy. The cost per person derived from this calculation shall be multiplied by the number of children who are the subject of the order and who are covered under the policy. This amount shall be added to the basic child support obligation and shall be divided between the parents in proportion to their adjusted gross incomes.

After the total child support obligation is calculated and divided between the parents in proportion to their adjusted gross incomes, the amount calculated in paragraph (c) of this subsection (10) shall be deducted from the obligor's share of the total child support obligation if the obligor is actually paying the premium. If the obligee is actually paying the premium, no further adjustment is necessary.

Prior to allowing the health insurance adjustment, the parent requesting the adjustment must submit proof that the child or children have been enrolled in a health insurance plan and must submit proof of the cost of the premium. The court shall require the parent receiving the adjustment to submit annually proof of continued coverage of the child or children to the delegate child support enforcement unit and to the other parent.

If a parent who is ordered by the court to provide medical or medical and dental insurance for the child or children has insurance that excludes coverage of the child or children because the child or children reside outside the geographic area covered by the insurance policy, the court shall order separate coverage for the child or children if the court determines coverage is available at a reasonable cost.

Where the application of the premium payment on the guidelines and schedule of basic child support obligations results in a child support order of fifty dollars or less, or the premium payment is five percent or more of the parent's gross income, the court or delegate child support enforcement unit may elect not to require the parent to include the child or children on an existing policy or to purchase insurance. The parent is, however, required to provide insurance when it becomes available at a reasonable cost.

Any extraordinary medical expenses incurred on behalf of the children shall be added to the basic child support obligation and shall be divided between the parents in proportion to their adjusted gross incomes.

Extraordinary medical expenses are uninsured expenses, including copayments and deductible amounts, in excess of two hundred fifty dollars per child per calendar year. Extraordinary medical expenses include, but need not be limited to, such reasonable costs as are reasonably necessary for orthodontia, dental treatment, asthma treatments, physical therapy, vision care, and any uninsured chronic health problem. At the discretion of the court, professional counseling or psychiatric therapy for diagnosed behavioral or mental health disorders may also be considered as an extraordinary medical expense.

Extraordinary adjustments to the schedule of basic child support obligations - periodic disability benefits.

By agreement of the parties or by order of court, the following reasonable and necessary expenses incurred on behalf of the child must be divided between the parents in proportion to their adjusted gross income:

Any expenses for attending any special or private elementary or secondary schools to meet the particular educational needs of the child or public school mandatory school fees; and

Any expenses for transportation of the child, or the child and an accompanying parent if the child is less than twelve years of age, between the homes of the parents.

Any additional factors that actually diminish the basic needs of the child may be considered for deductions from the basic child support obligation.

If the noncustodial parent receives periodic disability benefits granted by the federal "Old-age, Survivors, and Disability Insurance Act", 42 U.S.C. sec. 401 et seq., due to the disability of the noncustodial parent or receives employer-paid retirement benefits from the federal government due to the retirement of the noncustodial parent, the noncustodial parent shall notify the custodial party, and the delegate child support enforcement unit, if a party to the case, within sixty days after the noncustodial party receives notice of such benefits.

Absent good cause shown, the custodial parent must apply for dependent benefits for the child or children within sixty days after the custodial parent receives notification pursuant to subsection (11)(c)(I) of this section, and shall cooperate with the appropriate federal agency in completing any application for benefits.

In cases where the custodial parent receives periodic disability benefits granted by the federal "Old-age, Survivors, and Disability Insurance Act", 42 U.S.C. sec. 401 et seq., on behalf of dependent children due to the disability of the noncustodial parent or receives employer-paid retirement benefits from the federal government on behalf of dependent children due to the retirement of the noncustodial parent, the noncustodial parent's share of the total child support obligation as determined pursuant to subsection (8) of this section must be reduced in an amount equal to the amount of the benefits.

In cases where the custodial parent receives a lump sum retroactive award for benefits granted by the federal old-age, survivors, or disability insurance benefits program, 42 U.S.C. sec. 7, on behalf of a dependent child due to the disability of the noncustodial parent, or receives a lump sum retroactive award for employer-paid retirement benefits from the federal government on behalf of a dependent child due to the retirement of the noncustodial parent, the lump sum award received by the custodial parent must be credited against any retroactive support judgment or any past-due child support obligation, regardless of whether the past-due obligation has been reduced to judgment owed by the noncustodial parent. This credit must not be given against any amounts owed by the noncustodial parent for debt as defined in section 14-14-104 or for any retroactive support or any arrearage that accrued prior to the date of eligibility for disability or retirement benefits as determined by the social security administration. Any lump sum retirement or disability payments due to the retirement or disability of the noncustodial parent, received by the custodial parent as a result of the retirement or disability of the noncustodial parent, paid for a period of time that precedes the date of such benefit date eligibility, or any amount in excess of the established child support order or judgment, must be deemed a gratuity to the child.

Dependency exemptions. Unless otherwise agreed upon by the parties, the court shall allocate the right to claim dependent children for income tax purposes between the parties. These rights shall be allocated between the parties in proportion to their contributions to the costs of raising the children. A parent shall not be entitled to claim a child as a dependent if he or she has not paid all court-ordered child support for that tax year or if claiming the child as a dependent would not result in any tax benefit.

Emancipation.

For child support orders entered on or after July 1, 1997, unless a court finds that a child is otherwise emancipated, emancipation occurs and child support terminates without either party filing a motion when the last or only child attains nineteen years of age unless one or more of the following conditions exist:

The parties agree otherwise in a written stipulation after July 1, 1997;

If the child is mentally or physically disabled, the court or the delegate child support enforcement unit may order child support, including payments for medical expenses or insurance or both, to continue beyond the age of nineteen;

If the child is still in high school or an equivalent program, support continues until the end of the month following graduation. A child who ceases to attend high school prior to graduation and later reenrolls is entitled to support upon reenrollment and until the end of the month following graduation, but not beyond age twenty-one.

If the child marries, the child shall be considered emancipated as of the date of the marriage. If the marriage is annulled, dissolved, or declared invalid, child support may be reinstated.

If the child enters into active military duty, the child shall be considered emancipated.

Nothing in paragraph (a) of this subsection (13) or subsection (15) of this section shall preclude the parties from agreeing in a written stipulation or agreement on or after July 1, 1997, to continue child support beyond the age of nineteen or to provide for postsecondary education expenses for a child and to set forth the details of the payment of the expenses. If the stipulation or agreement is approved by the court and made part of a decree of dissolution of marriage or legal separation, the terms of the agreement shall be enforced as provided in section 14-10-112.

Annual exchange of information.
